Massachusetts, session 194th, S1928.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 21C of chapter 59 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by adding the following paragraph:-
(o) The local appropriating authority of any city or town may, by majority vote, seek
voter approval to limit the annual increase on the total taxes assessed on real property classified
as Class One, residential; provided, however, that the limit shall equal 3 per cent of the annual
increase or the percentage change in the Consumer Price Index published by the United States
Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, for such year, whichever is lower, for the
principal residence of a taxpayer as defined in section 1 of chapter 188; provided further, that the
limit shall not exceed 10 per cent of the annual increase for said real property that is not the
principal residence of a taxpayer as defined in said section 1 of said chapter 188; and provided
of 2

further, that the total taxes assessed on said real property shall not exceed the rate based on the
full and fair cash valuation of said property. The question submitted to the voters shall be worded
as follows:-
“Shall the (city/town) of _________ be allowed to limit the annual increase on the total
taxes assessed on real property classified as Class One, residential?
Yes ___ No ___.”
If a majority of the persons voting on the question shall vote “yes”, the local
appropriating authority of the city or town shall be allowed to limit the annual increase on the
total taxes assessed on real property classified as Class One, residential pursuant to this
paragraph; provided, however, that any limits established under this paragraph shall apply
automatically; provided further, that any limits established under this paragraph shall not apply
to any increases in value to said real property resulting from improvements made by the
taxpayer; provided further, that any limit established under this paragraph shall not apply in any
fiscal year in which the real property is sold or otherwise transferred for consideration; and
provided further, that should a taxpayer cease to reside or intend to reside in said real property as
the taxpayer’s principal residence as defined in said section 1 of said chapter 188, the taxpayer
shall notify the local assessor’s office within 30 days to avoid the assessment of any penalties or
any other real estate obligations.
of 2